New York, session 2025-2026, S10251.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the town of Babylon, county of Suffolk, is hereby 3 authorized to accept from Godschild Outreach Ministries, a not-for-pro- 4 fit organization, an application for exemption from real property taxes 5 pursuant to section 420-a of the real property tax law with respect to 6 the 2023-2024, 2024-2025, and 2025-2026 assessment rolls, for general 7 taxes and school taxes for the parcels conveyed to such organization, 8 with such parcels being located in the hamlet of Wyandanch, town of 9 Babylon, county of Suffolk, at 142 Irving Avenue, otherwise known as 10 Suffolk county tax map district 0100, section 58.00, block 03.00, lot 11 080.00. 12 If accepted, such application shall be reviewed as if it had been 13 received on or before the taxable status date established for such 14 rolls. If satisfied that such non-profit organization would otherwise be 15 entitled to such exemption if such organization had filed an application 16 for exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon 17 approval by the town of Babylon town board, may grant exemption from all 18 taxation and make appropriate corrections to the subject rolls. If such 19 exemption is granted and such organization therefore shall have paid any 20 tax with respect to the subject rolls, the applicable governing body or 21 tax department may, in its sole discretion, provide for the refund of 22 the taxes paid, along with any fines or penalties paid, and cancel any 23 taxes, fines, penalties, interest, or tax liens remaining unpaid. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13389-04-6